Maryland, session 2026, HB0832.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–535.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION, “STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” MEANS A
GOVERNMENTAL POLICE FORCE, SECURITY FORCE, OR LAW ENFORCEMENT
ORGANIZATION OF THE STATE THAT BY STATUTE, ORDINANCE, OR COMMON LAW IS
AUTHORIZED TO ENFORCE THE GENERAL CRIMINAL LAWS OF THE STATE.
(2) “STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY” INCLUDES:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0832*

HOUSE BILL 832
(I) THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE;
(II) THE MARYLAND TRANSPORTATION AUTHORITY POLICE;
(III) THE POLICE FORCES OF THE DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL
RESOURCES;
(IV) THE POLICE FORCE OF THE MARYLAND CAPITOL POLICE
OF THE DEPARTMENT OF GENERAL SERVICES;
(V) THE OFFICE OF STATE FIRE MARSHAL;
(VI) THE POLICE FORCE OF THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF
HEALTH;
(VII) THE FIELD ENFORCEMENT DIVISION OF THE
COMPTROLLER’S OFFICE; AND
(VIII) THE FIELD ENFORCEMENT DIVISION OF THE ALCOHOL,
TOBACCO, AND CANNABIS COMMISSION.
(B) A STATE LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY MAY NOT HIRE FOR EMPLOYMENT
AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS HIRED AS A SWORN OFFICER OF UNITED STATES
IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCEMENT ON OR AFTER JANUARY 20, 2025.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any individual hired by a State law enforcement agency before the effective
date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.